District of Columbia statutes.
22-3402

Use of “District of Columbia” or similar designation by private detective or collection agency — Penalty.

Any person who violates § 22-3401 shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Oct. 16, 1962, 76 Stat. 1071, Pub. L. 87-837, § 2
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 235, 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 22-3401.
1981 Ed., § 22-3424.
1973 Ed., § 22-3424.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “of not more than $300”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 235 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.